North Carolina statutes. Chapter 52C. Uniform Interstate Family Support Act.
Article 4. Establishment of Support Order or Determination of Parentage.

Official Comment (2015)

A fundamental principle of U.S. jurisprudence is that our courts are open to litigants with a valid cause of action. This article makes clear this principle applies to support actions, whether initiated by a resident of the United States or of a foreign nation.

§ 52C-4-401.
Establishment of support order.

If a support order entitled to recognition under this Chapter has not been issued, a responding tribunal of this State with personal jurisdiction over the parties may issue a support order if:

The individual seeking the order resides outside this State; or

The support enforcement agency seeking the order is located outside this State.

The tribunal may issue a temporary child support order if the tribunal determines that such an order is appropriate and the individual ordered to pay is any of the following:

A presumed father of the child.

Petitioning to have his paternity adjudicated.

Identified as the father of the child through genetic testing.

An alleged father who has declined to submit to genetic testing.

Shown by clear and convincing evidence to be the father of the child.

An acknowledged father as provided by Chapter 110 of the General Statutes.

The mother of the child.

An individual who has been ordered to pay child support in a previous proceeding and the order has not been reversed or vacated.

Upon finding, after notice and opportunity to be heard, that an obligor owes a duty of support, the tribunal shall issue a support order directed to the obligor and may issue other orders pursuant to

G.S. 52C-3-305

.

History.

1995, c. 538, s. 7(c); 2015-117, s. 1.

Official Comment (2015)

This section authorizes a responding tribunal of this state to issue temporary and permanent support orders binding on an obligor over whom the tribunal has personal jurisdiction when the person or entity requesting the order is “outside this state,” i.e., anywhere else in the world. UIFSA does not permit such orders to be issued when another support order entitled to recognition exists, thereby prohibiting a second tribunal from establishing another support order and the accompanying continuing, exclusive jurisdiction over the matter.
See
Sections 205 and 206.

Related to Convention: art. 11. Application contents; art. 14. Effective access to procedures; art. 15. Free legal assistance for child support applications; art. 16. Declaration to permit use of child-centered means test; art. 17. Applications not qualifying under 15 or 16; art. 20. Bases for recognition and enforcement; art. 25. Documents; art. 27. Findings of fact; art. 28. No review of the merits; art. 37. Direct requests to competent authorities; art. 56. Transitional provisions.

§ 52C-4-402.
Proceeding to determine parentage.

A tribunal of this State authorized to determine parentage of a child may serve as a responding tribunal in a proceeding to determine parentage of a child brought under this Chapter or a law or procedure substantially similar to this Chapter.

History.

2015-117, s. 1.

Official Comment (2015)

This article authorizes a “pure” parentage action in the interstate context, i.e., an action not joined with a claim for support. The mother, an alleged father of a child, or a support enforcement agency may bring such an action. Typically an action to determine parentage across a state line or international border will also seek to establish a support order.
See
Section 401. An action to establish parentage under UIFSA is to be treated identically to such an action brought in the responding state.

In a departure from the rest of this act, in UIFSA (2001) the term “tribunal” was replaced by “court” in this section. The several states have a variety of combinations of judicial or administrative entities that are authorized to establish, enforce, and modify a child-support order. Because the Uniform Parentage Act (UPA) (2000) § 104 restricts parentage determinations to “a court,”
see
UPA (2000) § 104, the drafters took the view that only a judicial officer should determine parentage as a matter of public policy. This conclusion was in error insofar as some states are concerned and is reversed in this iteration of the act.

Related to Convention: art. 2. Scope; art. 6. Specific functions of Central Authorities; art. 10. Available applications.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “For the Sake of the Child: Parental Recognition in the Age of Assisted Reproductive Technology A Framework for North Carolina,” see 43 Campbell L. Rev. 21 (2021).